Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2624.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 4-204, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE4-204. Personal representative or fiduciary acting for licensee A. A person acting as administrator, executor or guardian of the estate of any licensee or a person acting as receiver for any licensee, trustee of the bankrupt estate of any licensee or assignee for the benefit of creditors of a licensee is authorized, upon on receiving permission from the director, to sell and deal in spirituous liquors under authority of the license issued to the licensee for whom the person is acting for a period not exceeding twenty-four months from the date of the appointment of such person as administrator, executor, guardian, receiver, trustee or assignee for the benefit of creditors. B. The provisions of This section shall does not apply if at any time during the twenty-four months an administrator, executor or guardian of the estate of a licensee who has received the permission from the director as provided in subsection A of this section transfers the license to the surviving spouse or the guardian of the minor child of the licensee. C. A person, authorized representative or assignee,  meeting the qualifications of section 4-202, not licensed under the provisions of this chapter,  and owning or possessing spirituous liquor as a result of enforcement of a security interest in the property of a wholesaler licensed under this chapter is authorized, upon on receiving permission from the director, to sell such spirituous liquor to a licensee authorized to sell spirituous liquor for resale. Sections 4-201, 4-203 and 4-243.01 shall not apply to nor restrict the authority granted under this provision subsection. END_STATUTE